Nebraska, session 109, LB17.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB17 LB17
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 76-1401, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
76-1401 Sections 76-1401 to 76-1449 and section 2 of this act shall
be known and may be cited as the Uniform Residential Landlord and Tenant
Act.
Sec. 2. (1) Except as provided in this section, a landlord shall
not require the payment by a tenant or prospective tenant of any fee,
charge, reimbursement, or remuneration, however denominated.
(2) A landlord may require payment of:
(a) Rent as provided in the rental agreement;
(b) A security deposit in compliance with section 76-1416;
(c) A fee for payments returned for insufficient funds, not to
exceed the cost charged to the landlord for insufficient funds;
(d) A late fee for rental payments made after the date rent is due,
not to exceed five percent of the payment past due or fifty dollars,
whichever is less; and
(e) An application fee not to exceed the actual cost of obtaining a
consumer report on the prospective tenant from a consumer reporting
agency.
(3) A landlord shall not:
(a) Charge a prospective tenant a rental application fee when the
landlord knows or should have known that no rental unit is available at
that time or will be available within a reasonable future time;
(b) Collect or hold a rental application fee without giving a
written receipt, which may be incorporated into the application form;
(c) Use, cash, or deposit a rental application fee until all prior
applicants have either been screened and rejected or offered the unit and
declined to enter into a rental agreement; or
(d) Charge a prospective tenant a rental application fee different
than the rental application fee charged to another prospective tenant who
applies to rent:
-2-

LB17 LB17
2025 2025
(i) The same dwelling unit; or
(ii) If the landlord offers more than one dwelling unit for rent at
the same time, any other dwelling unit offered by the landlord.
(4) A landlord shall not retain, use, cash, or deposit rental
application fees or residual rental application fees if:
(a) A prior applicant is offered the unit and agrees to enter into a
rental agreement;
(b) The landlord does not use the rental application fee to obtain a
consumer report regarding the prospective tenant;
(c) The landlord failed to provide the notice as required in
subsection (11) of this section prior to accepting a prospective tenant's
rental application; or
(d) The landlord does not use the entire amount of the rental
application fee collected to obtain a consumer report regarding the
prospective tenant.
(5)(a) A landlord shall provide to a prospective tenant a copy of
any consumer report, including tenant background screening reports, that
the landlord obtained, whether directly or using a consumer reporting
agency, regarding that prospective tenant.
(b) The landlord may provide an electronic copy of each consumer
report unless the prospective tenant requests a paper copy, in which
case, the landlord shall provide the prospective tenant a paper copy of
each consumer report.
(c) In addition to each consumer report, the landlord shall provide
written notification of:
(i) The name, address, and phone number of each consumer reporting
agency that furnished a consumer report;
(ii) The prospective tenant's right to access all information held
by a consumer reporting agency and to dispute the accuracy of a consumer
report with the consumer reporting agency; and
(iii) Advisement of the prospective tenant's right to review
-3-

LB17 LB17
2025 2025
criminal history record information maintained by any system in this
state to determine its accuracy pursuant to section 29-3525.
(6) If a landlord denies a prospective tenant's application or takes
other adverse action, the landlord shall provide a written notice to the
prospective tenant that states the reasons for the denial or adverse
action with specificity, including:
(a) The name and address of the prospective tenant;
(b) Notification that the application has been rejected, the
application has been approved with conditions that are specifically
described, or specifying some other adverse action;
(c) Detailed information regarding the grounds for application
denial or other adverse action, specifying whether the application denial
or other adverse action was based on one or more of the following:
(i) Information contained in a consumer report;
(ii) A lack of sufficient information in the consumer report;
(iii) Information received from previous rental history or
reference;
(iv) Information received in a criminal record;
(v) Information received in a civil record;
(vi) Information received from an employment verification; or
(vii) Another specifically described reason.
(7) A landlord shall make a good-faith effort to provide the notice
required by subsection (6) of this section no later than twenty calendar
days after making the decision to deny the prospective tenant's rental
application or take other adverse action.
(8) The rental application fee or any unused portion thereof may be
returned by mail, may be destroyed upon the prospective tenant's request
if paid by check, or may be made available for the applicant to retrieve.
A landlord shall make a good-faith effort to remit such amount within ten
calendar days after processing the application.
(9) This section does not:
-4-

LB17 LB17
2025 2025
(a) Limit the rights of a prospective tenant or the duties of a
credit reporting agency as otherwise provided in the Credit Report
Protection Act or federal Fair Credit Reporting Act; or
(b) Limit enforcement or civil liability for:
(i) Knowingly disseminating criminal history record information in
violation of section 29-3527 or 43-2,108.05; or
(ii) Negligently or willfully failing to comply with requirements
imposed under sections 616 and 617 of the federal Fair Credit Reporting
Act, 15 U.S.C. 1681n and 1682o.
(10) A landlord may charge reasonable fees for optional goods or
services provided to a tenant only if the tenant provides written,
informed consent after the tenant has received a disclosure from the
landlord which contains a description of the good or service, the amount
and frequency of the fee for the good or service, and how the tenant can
cancel or opt out of the good or service. The tenant must be allowed to
opt out of the good or service at any time.
(11) A landlord must disclose the total cost of rent in writing to a
tenant before the tenant submits an application for a dwelling unit,
including an itemization of any mandatory and optional fees with a
description of the frequency of such fees. All fees must be described in
a written rental agreement signed by both parties.
(12) Any violation of this section shall be considered a violation
of section 59-1602 and be subject to the Consumer Protection Act and any
other law which provides for the implementation and enforcement of
section 59-1602. Such violation may be enforced in a civil action by the
aggrieved person or the Attorney General. A landlord who knowingly
violates this section may be subject to civil penalties of up to three
hundred dollars per violation, plus court costs and reasonable attorney's
fees.
Sec. 3. Original section 76-1401, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-5-